Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-21,260
Voluntary self-evaluation; disclose possible violations.

A person performing a voluntary self-evaluation may disclose in writing a possible violation of an environmental requirement to an agency having regulatory authority showing:

(1) A description of the possible violation;

(2) The date of discovery of the possible violation and, if known, the date the possible violation occurred; and

(3) Actions taken to correct the possible violation and, if applicable, a schedule to achieve compliance.

Laws 1998, LB 395, § 7.